Washington statutes.
RCW 39.34.170

Transactions between state agencies—Powers and authority cumulative.

The powers and authority conferred by RCW 39.34.130 through 39.34.160 shall be construed as in addition and supplemental to powers or authority conferred by any other law, and not to limit any other powers or authority of any public agency expressly granted by any other statute.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 61 s 5.]